District of Columbia statutes.
47-2504

Washington Stock Exchange.

The Washington Stock Exchange, through its president or treasurer, shall pay to the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia a sum equal to $500 per annum in lieu of tax on the members thereof for business done on said exchange.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 622, ch. 1352, § 6, par. 15
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2504.
1973 Ed., § 47-1707.

Editor's Notes

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.